Maine, session 132, LD1852.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §701-A, 3rd ¶, as amended by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. B, §4 and
affected by §7, is further amended to read:
For the purpose of establishing the valuation of improved real property, the property
must be valued based on its highest and best use as of April 1st of each year, taking all of
the following 3 approaches to value into consideration: cost, income and sales comparison.
In establishing the valuation of improved real property, assessors shall consider age,
condition, use, type of construction, location, design, physical features and economic
characteristics. When considering location, if the improved real property abuts a solar
energy development or grid-scale wind energy development, the assessors shall reduce the
valuation of the real property as a result of its proximity to the solar energy development
or grid-scale wind energy development and determine the just value of the real property
appropriately. As used in this paragraph, "solar energy development" means a development
that uses ground-mounted solar arrays and installations to convert solar energy to electrical
energy for sale or use by a person other than the generator and "grid-scale wind energy
development" means a development that uses a windmill or wind turbine to convert wind
energy to electrical energy for sale or use by a person other than the generator and includes
generating facilities and associated facilities, as those terms are defined in Title 35-A,
section 3451, subsection 5 and subsection 1, respectively.
Sec. 2. Application. This Act applies to property tax years beginning on or after
April 1, 2026.